pt-PT: Elementos de segurança das notas: Tinta que muda de cor; Holograma/emblema metálico; Faixa iridescente; Microimpressão; Perfurações; Impressão calcográfica em relevo; Fio de segurança; Registo translúcido; Prefixo/sufixo do número de série; Elementos UV; Marca de água; Fio de segurança com janelas; Outro
es: Funciones de seguridad del billete: Tinta que cambia de color; Holograma/parche metalizado; Banda iridiscente; Microimpresión; Perforaciones; Impresión calcográfica en relieve; Hilo de seguridad; Registro transparente; Prefijo/sufijo de número de serie; Características UV; Marca de agua; Hilo de seguridad con ventana; Otra
lt-LT: Banknotų apsaugos elementai: Spalvą keičiantis rašalas; Holograma / folijos elementas; Vaivorykštinė juosta; Mikrotekstas; Perforacija; Iškili giliaspaudė; Apsauginis siūlelis; Sutampantis motyvas; Serijos numerio priešdėlis / priesaga; UV apsaugos elementai; Vandens ženklas; Langelyje matomas apsauginis siūlelis; Kita
sl-SI: Varnostni elementi bankovca: Barvno prelivajoče črnilo; Hologram/folija; Iridiscentni trak; Mikrotisk; Perforacije; Globoki tisk (intaglio); Varnostna nit; Presojni register; Predpona/pripona serijske številke; UV-zaščita; Vodni žig; Varnostna nit z okenci; Drugo
zh-TW: 鈔票安全功能: 變色油墨; 全息 / 燙印箔; 虹彩條紋; 微縮印刷; 穿孔; 凹版印刷; 安全線; 透視對印; 序號字首/字尾; 紫外線防偽; 浮水印; 窗式安全線; 其他
bg-BG: Защитни елементи на банкнотата: Мастило с променящ се цвят; Холограма / фолио; Иридисцентна лента; Микропечат; Перфорации; Релефен дълбок печат; Осигурителна нишка; Прозрачен регистър; Префикс/суфикс на сериен номер; UV елементи; Воден знак; Прозоречна осигурителна нишка; Друго
ru: Защитные элементы банкнот: Цветопеременная краска; Голограмма / вставка из фольги; Радужная полоса; Микротекст; Перфорация; Рельефная глубокая печать; Защитная нить; Совмещающееся изображение; Префикс/суффикс серийного номера; УФ-защита; Водяной знак; Ныряющая защитная нить; Другое
fi: Setelin turvaominaisuudet: Väriä vaihtava muste; Hologrammi/foliomerkki; Helmiäisnauha; Mikropainatus; Rei'itykset; Kohopainatus; Turvalanka; Kohdistusmerkki; Sarjanumeron etu-/jälkiliite; UV-ominaisuudet; Vesileima; Ikkunallinen turvalanka; Muu
hr-HR: Sigurnosne značajke novčanica: Tinta koja mijenja boju; Hologram / folija; Iridiscentna traka; Mikrotisak; Perforacije; Ispupčeni duboki tisak; Zaštitna nit; Prozirni registar; Prefiks / sufiks serijskog broja; UV značajke; Vodeni žig; Zaštitna nit s prozorčićima; Ostalo
pl: Zabezpieczenia banknotów: Farba zmienna optycznie; Hologram / element foliowy; Pasek opalizujący; Mikrodruk; Perforacje; Druk wypukły (intaglio); Nitka zabezpieczająca; Znak recto-verso; Prefiks/sufiks numeru seryjnego; Zabezpieczenia UV; Znak wodny; Okienkowa nitka zabezpieczająca; Inne
vi: Tính năng bảo an của tiền giấy: Mực đổi màu; Hologram / miếng dán ép kim; Dải xà cừ; In siêu nhỏ; Lỗ đục; In lõm nổi; Dây bảo an; Hình định vị nhìn xuyên thấu; Tiền tố/hậu tố số sê-ri; Đặc điểm phát quang UV; Hình mờ; Dây bảo an dạng cửa sổ; Khác
ro-RO: Caracteristici de securitate ale bancnotelor: Cerneală cu variație de culoare; Hologramă / aplică de folie; Dungă irizată; Microimprimare; Perforații; Imprimare intaglio în relief; Fir de siguranță; Registru transparent; Prefix/Sufix număr de serie; Elemente UV; Filigran; Fir de siguranță cu ferestre; Altele
sk-SK: Zabezpečovacie prvky bankoviek: Farbu meniaci atrament; Hologram/fóliová záplata; Iridescentný pásik; Mikrotlač; Perforácie; Vystúpená hĺbkotlač; Ochranný prúžok; Sútlačová značka; Predpona/prípona sériového čísla; Prvky UV; Vodoznak; Okienkový ochranný prúžok; Iné
da: Pengesedlens sikkerhedsfunktioner: Farveskiftende blæk; Hologram / foliemærke; Iriserende stribe; Mikrotryk; Perforeringer; Hævet dybtryk; Sikkerhedstråd; Gennemsigtigt register; Præfiks/suffiks for serienummer; UV-funktioner; Vandmærke; Sikkerhedstråd med vinduer; Andet
pt-BR: Recursos de segurança das notas: Tinta que muda de cor; Holograma / adesivo de foil; Faixa iridescente; Microimpressão; Perfurações; Impressão em alto relevo; Fio de segurança; Registro coincidente; Prefixo/sufixo de número de série; Elementos UV; Marca-d'água; Fio de segurança com janelas; Outro
nb: Sikkerhetsfunksjoner i pengeseddel: Fargeskiftende blekk; Hologram / folielapp; Iriserende stripe; Mikroskrift; Perforeringer; Opphøyd dyptrykk; Sikkerhetstråd; Gjennomsiktig register; Serienummerprefiks/-suffiks; UV-elementer; Vannmerke; Sikkerhetstråd med vindu; Annet
tr: Banknot güvenliği özellikleri: Renk değiştiren mürekkep; Hologram / folyo yama; Yanardöner şerit; Mikro baskı; Delikler; Kabartmalı çukur baskı; Güvenlik şeridi; Saydam kayıt; Seri numarası öneki/soneki; UV özellikleri; Filigran; Pencereli güvenlik şeridi; Diğer
ja: 紙幣セキュリティ機能: 色変化インク; ホログラム / フォイルパッチ; 玉虫色ストライプ; マイクロ文字; 穿孔; 凹版印刷; セキュリティスレッド; 透かし合わせ; シリアル番号のプレフィックス/サフィックス; UV 機能; 透かし; 窓開きセキュリティスレッド; その他
en: Banknote security features: Color-shifting ink; Hologram / foil patch; Iridescent stripe; Microprinting; Perforations; Raised intaglio print; Security thread; See-through register; Serial number prefix/suffix; UV features; Watermark; Windowed security thread; Other
hu: Bankjegy biztonsági jellemzői: Színváltós tinta; Hologram / fóliafolt; Irizáló sáv; Mikroírás; Perforációk; Tapintható mélynyomás; Biztonsági szál; Illeszkedőjel; Sorozatszám előtag/utótag; UV-elemek; Vízjel; Ablakos biztonsági szál; Egyéb
fr: Éléments de sécurité des billets de banque: Encre à couleur changeante; Hologramme / patch en aluminium; Bande iridescente; Micro-impression; Perforations; Impression en taille-douce en relief; Fil de sécurité; Motif transvision; Préfixe/suffixe de numéro de série; Éléments UV; Filigrane; Fil de sécurité à fenêtres; Autre
de: Banknoten-Sicherheitsmerkmale: Optisch variable Farbe; Hologramm / Folienpatch; Iriodinstreifen; Mikroschrift; Perforationen; Erhabener Stichtiefdruck; Sicherheitsfaden; Durchsichtsregister; Seriennummern-Präfix/-Suffix; UV-Merkmale; Wasserzeichen; Fenstersicherheitsfaden; Sonstige
nl: Beveiligingskenmerken bankbiljet: Kleurveranderende inkt; Hologram / foliepatch; Iriserende streep; Microprint; Perforaties; Verhoogde diepdruk; Veiligheidsdraad; Doorkijkregister; Voorvoegsel/achtervoegsel serienummer; UV-kenmerken; Watermerk; Vensterveiligheidsdraad; Overig
ko: 지폐 위변조 방지 기능: 변색 잉크; 홀로그램/호일 패치; 무지갯빛 스트라이프; 미세 문자 인쇄; 천공; 요철 음각 인쇄; 보안선; 앞뒤판 맞춤; 일련번호 접두사/접미사; UV 기능; 워터마크; 부분 노출 은선; 기타
el: Χαρακτηριστικά ασφαλείας τραπεζογραμματίου: Μελάνι που αλλάζει χρώμα; Ολόγραμμα / επίθεμα foil; Ιριδίζουσα λωρίδα; Μικροεκτύπωση; Διατρήσεις; Ανάγλυφη εκτύπωση (βαθυτυπία); Νήμα ασφαλείας; Σύμπτωση όψεων; Πρόθεμα/κατάληξη σειριακού αριθμού; Στοιχεία UV; Υδατογράφημα; Νήμα ασφαλείας με παράθυρο; Άλλο
zh-CN: 纸币防伪特征: 变色油墨; 全息图/贴片; 珠光条带; 缩微印刷; 穿孔; 凸起凹版印刷; 安全线; 对印图案; 序列号前缀/后缀; 紫外线防伪; 水印; 开窗安全线; 其他
sv: Sedelsäkerhetsfunktioner: Färgskiftande bläck; Hologram/foliemärke; Iriserande remsa; Mikrotryck; Perforeringar; Upphöjt djuptryck; Säkerhetstråd; Genomsiktsbild; Serienummerprefix/suffix; UV-detaljer; Vattenstämpel; Fönstersäkerhetstråd; Övrigt
it: Caratteristiche di sicurezza delle banconote: Inchiostro cangiante; Ologramma / patch in lamina; Striscia iridescente; Microstampa; Perforazioni; Stampa a rilievo (calcografia); Filo di sicurezza; Registro a transvisione; Prefisso/suffisso numero di serie; Caratteristiche UV; Filigrana; Filo di sicurezza a finestre; Altro
th: คุณสมบัติการรักษาความปลอดภัยของธนบัตร: หมึกเปลี่ยนสี; โฮโลแกรม / แถบฟอยล์; แถบสีเหลือบรุ้ง; การพิมพ์ตัวอักษรขนาดจิ๋ว; รอยปรุ; การพิมพ์เลตเตอร์เพรสเส้นนูน; แถบสายฝังในเนื้อกระดาษ; ลวดลายซ้อนทับ; คำนำหน้า/คำต่อท้ายหมายเลขซีเรียล; จุดสังเกตภายใต้แสง UV; ลายน้ำ; แถบสายฝังในเนื้อกระดาษแบบหน้าต่าง; อื่นๆ
cs: Ochranné prvky bankovek: Inkoust měnící barvu; Hologram / fóliové pole; Iridiscentní proužek; Mikrotisk; Perforace; Vystouplý hlubotisk; Ochranný proužek; Soutisková značka; Předpona/přípona sériového čísla; UV ochranné prvky; Vodoznak; Okénkový ochranný proužek; Jiné